src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
!! # Verb inflection
! ---------------

!! ## Temporary lexica


LEXICON V_ !!≈ * **@CODE@** is for ad-hoc incoming verbs, not in xml
+TYÄ: K ;


!! ## Auxiliary verbs

LEXICON V-NEG !!≈ * **@CODE@** ei:e
+Neg+Sg1:n K ;
+Neg+Sg2:t K ;
+Neg+Sg3:i K ;
+Neg+Pl1:mmo K ;
+Neg+Pl2:tto K ;
+Neg+Pl3:i K ;  ! FMT/TAP: Fewer paradigm gaps is better for MTs ! 

LEXICON V-PROH !!≈ * **@CODE@** älä:äl
+Neg+Imprt+Sg2:ä K ;
+Neg+Imprt+Sg3:gäh K ;
+Neg+Imprt+Pl1:giämmö K ;
+Neg+Imprt+Pl2:giä K ;
!+Neg+Pl3:i K ;

LEXICON V_OLLA !!≈ * **@CODE@** olla:o
:%{back%} V_OLLA_01 ;
LEXICON V_OLLA_01 !!≈ * **@CODE@** olla:o
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1:le%>n K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2:le%>t K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:n K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1:le%>mm%{oö%} K ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2:le%>tt%{oö%} K ;
+Act:l INDPRSPL3_DAh ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:le K ;

+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1:l%>in K ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:l%>it K ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3:l%>i K ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1:l%>imm%{oö%} K ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2:l%>itt%{oö%} K ;
+Act:l INDPRTPL3_dih     ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:l%>%{lnrs%}%{uy%}h K ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+ConNeg+Pl3:l%>t%{uy%} K ;
+Act:l CONDPRS_IS  ;
+Act:l CONDPRSPL3_DAs ;
+Act:l CONDPRT_nUs ;
+Act:l CONDPRTPL3_DAnnUs ;
+Act:l POT_N ;
+Act:l POTPL3_DAnneh ;
+Act:l IMPRT_GA ;
+Act:l IMPRTPL3_DAhes ;
:li ACT-PRSPRC_OSTAI ;
:l ACT-PRFPRC_nUH ;
:l PSS-PRSPRC_DAvU ;
:l PSS-PRFPRC_DU ;
:le M-INF ;
+Inf:lla K ;
+Ger+Manner:%>de%^WGStemn K ;
+Ger+Temp:%>de%^WGStems K ;



!! ## Regular verbs

!! ### Verbs ending in a diphthong
!! The verb has only a vowel stem, which may be either weak or strong.
!! -ua/-iä, -ie, -UO

! V1a

! -ua/iä two‑syllable stem

LEXICON V_KANDUA !!≈ * **@CODE@** kandua:kanda
!! Back Vowel
:%{back%} V_KANDUA_01 ;
LEXICON V_KANDUA_01 !!≈ * **@CODE@** kandua:kanda
!! Gradation Yes
:%^WGStem  V-VV_01_Harm-Neutr_USUALLY-WEAK ;
:%^WGStem%^A2O V-VV_01_Harm-Neutr_USUALLY-WEAK-VOWEL-LOSS ;
:  V-VV_01_Harm-Neutr_USUALLY-STRONG ;
:%^A2O  V-VV_01_Harm-Neutr_USUALLY-STRONG-VOWEL-LOSS ;
INF_A ;

!LEXICON V_KANDUA-SG3 !!≈ * __@CODE@__ kandua:kanda
!:%{back%}%^WGStem  V-VV_01_USUALLY-WEAK ;
!:%{back%}%^WGStem%^A2O V-VV_01_USUALLY-WEAK-VOWEL-LOSS ;
!:%{back%}  V-VV_01_BACK_USUALLY-STRONG ;
!:%{back%}%^A2O  V-VV_01_BACK_USUALLY-STRONG-VOWEL-LOSS ;
!:%{back%}  INDPRSSG3_BACK ;
!:%{back%} INDPRSCONNEG_WEAK ;
!:%{back%} INDPRTSG3 ;
!:%{back%} INDPRTCONNEG_nuh ;
!+Inf:%{back%}%^A2U%>a K ;

!LEXICON V_KANDUA-3 !!≈ * __@CODE@__ kandua:kanda
!:%{back%}%^WGStem  V-VV_01_USUALLY-WEAK ;
!:%{back%}%^WGStem%^A2O V-VV_01_USUALLY-WEAK-VOWEL-LOSS ;
!:%{back%}  V-VV_01_BACK_USUALLY-STRONG ;
!:%{back%}%^A2O  V-VV_01_BACK_USUALLY-STRONG-VOWEL-LOSS ;
!+Inf:%{back%}%^A2U%>a K ;

LEXICON V_OTTUA !!≈ * **@CODE@** ottua:otta
!! Back Vowel
:%{back%} V_OTTUA/HEITTIÄ_01 ;
LEXICON V_OTTUA/HEITTIÄ_01 !!≈ * **@CODE@** ottua:otta
!! Gradation Yes
+Der+Der/Rc+V: VR_OTTUA/HEITTIÄ_01 ;
:%^WGStem  V-VV_01_Harm-Neutr_USUALLY-WEAK ;
:%^WGStem%^RmVow V-VV_01_Harm-Neutr_USUALLY-WEAK-VOWEL-LOSS ;

:  V-VV_01_Harm-Neutr_USUALLY-STRONG ;
:%^RmVow  V-VV_01_Harm-Neutr_USUALLY-STRONG-VOWEL-LOSS ;
: ACT-PRFPRC_nUH ;!2025-09-05
INF_A ;

LEXICON V_OTTUA-SG3 !!≈ * **@CODE@** ottua:otta
:%{back%}%^WGStem  V-VV_01_USUALLY-WEAK ;
:%{back%}%^WGStem%^RmVow V-VV_01_USUALLY-WEAK-VOWEL-LOSS ;
:%{back%}  V-VV_01_BACK_USUALLY-STRONG ;
:%{back%}%^RmVow  V-VV_01_BACK_USUALLY-STRONG-VOWEL-LOSS ;
:%{back%}  INDPRSSG3_BACK ;
:%{back%} INDPRSCONNEG_WEAK ;
:%{back%} INDPRTSG3 ;
:%{back%} INDPRTCONNEG_nuh ;
!+Inf:%{back%}%^A2U%>a K ;
:%{back%} INF_A ;

LEXICON V_OTTUA-3 !!≈ * **@CODE@** ottua:otta
:%{back%}%^WGStem  V-VV_01_USUALLY-WEAK ;
:%{back%}%^WGStem%^RmVow V-VV_01_USUALLY-WEAK-VOWEL-LOSS ;
:%{back%}  V-VV_01_BACK_USUALLY-STRONG ;
:%{back%}%^RmVow  V-VV_01_BACK_USUALLY-STRONG-VOWEL-LOSS ;
+Inf:%{back%}%^A2U%>a K ;

LEXICON V_HEITTIÄ !!≈ * **@CODE@** heittä:heittä
!! Front vowel
:%{front%} V_OTTUA/HEITTIÄ_01 ;

LEXICON V_HEITTIÄ-SG3 !!≈ * **@CODE@** heittä:heittä
:%{front%}%^WGStem V-VV_01_USUALLY-WEAK ;
:%{front%}%^WGStem%^RmVow V-VV_01_USUALLY-WEAK-VOWEL-LOSS ;
:%{front%} V-VV_01_FRONT_USUALLY-STRONG ;
:%{front%}%^RmVow  V-VV_01_FRONT_USUALLY-STRONG-VOWEL-LOSS ;
:%{front%}  INDPRSSG3_FRONT ;
:%{front%} INDPRSCONNEG_WEAK ;
:%{front%} INDPRTSG3 ;
:%{front%} INDPRTCONNEG_nUh ;
+Inf:%{front%}%^Ä2I%>ä K ;

LEXICON V_HEITTIÄ-3 !!≈ * **@CODE@** heittä:tiedä
:%{front%}%^WGStem V-VV_01_USUALLY-WEAK ;
:%{front%}%^WGStem%^RmVow V-VV_01_USUALLY-WEAK-VOWEL-LOSS ;
:%{front%} V-VV_01_FRONT_USUALLY-STRONG ;
:%{front%}%^RmVow  V-VV_01_FRONT_USUALLY-STRONG-VOWEL-LOSS ;
+Inf:%{front%}%^Ä2I%>ä K ;

LEXICON V_TIEDIÄ !!≈ * **@CODE@** tiediä:ti
!! Front vowel
:%{front%} V_TIEDIÄ_01 ;
LEXICON V_TIEDIÄ_01
!! Gradation Yes
+Der+Der/Rc+V: VR_TIEDIÄ_01 ;
:ijä  V-VV_01_Harm-Neutr_USUALLY-WEAK ;
:ez V-VV_01_Harm-Neutr_USUALLY-WEAK-VOWEL-LOSS ;

:edä  V-VV_01_Harm-Neutr_USUALLY-STRONG ;
:ez  V-VV_01_Harm-Neutr_USUALLY-STRONG-VOWEL-LOSS ;
:edä INF_A ;

LEXICON VR_TIEDIÄ_01
:edä     VR_01-Harm-Neutr-LONGSTEM-USUALLY-STRONG_ ;
:ijä     VR_01-Harm-Neutr-LONGSTEM-USUALLY-WEAK ;  
:ij     VR_01-Harm-Neutr-LONGSTEM-USUALLY-WEAK-VOWEL-LOSS ;  
:ed     VR_01-Harm-Neutr-LONGSTEM-USUALLY-STRONG-VOWEL-LOSS ;  
:edä     VR_01-Harm-Neutr-SHORTSTEM-USUALLY-STRONG_ ;
:ijä     VR_01-Harm-Neutr-SHORTSTEM-USUALLY-WEAK_ ;
:edä INF-RC_Akseh ;

LEXICON  V_PIDIÄ !!≈ * **@CODE@** pidiä:pidä
!! Gradation Yes
!! Front vowel
:%{front%} V_PIDIÄ_01 ;
LEXICON  V_PIDIÄ_01 !!≈ * **@CODE@** pidiä:pidä
:%^WGStem V-VV_01_USUALLY-WEAK ;
:%^WGStem%^RmVow V-VV_01_USUALLY-WEAK-VOWEL-LOSS ;
: V-VV_01_FRONT_USUALLY-STRONG ;
:%^RmVow  V-VV_01_FRONT_USUALLY-STRONG-VOWEL-LOSS ;
INF_A ;

LEXICON  V_PIDIÄ-SG3 !!≈ * **@CODE@** pidiä:pidä
:%{front%} V_PIDIÄ-SG3_01 ;
LEXICON  V_PIDIÄ-SG3_01 !!≈ * **@CODE@** pidiä:pidä
:%^WGStem V-VV_01_USUALLY-WEAK ;
:%^WGStem%^RmVow V-VV_01_USUALLY-WEAK-VOWEL-LOSS ;
: V-VV_01_FRONT_USUALLY-STRONG ;
:%^RmVow  V-VV_01_FRONT_USUALLY-STRONG-VOWEL-LOSS ;
+Inf:%^Ä2I%>ä K ;

! V_VEDIÄ vien, vedäy, vietäh

!! -ua/iä polysyllabic stem

LEXICON V_ALENDUA !!≈ * **@CODE@** alendua:alenda
!! Harmony: Back
:%{back%} V_ALENDUA/ELLENDIÄ_01 ;

LEXICON V_ELLENDIÄ !!≈ * **@CODE@** ellendiä:ellendä
!! Harmony: Front
:%{front%} V_ALENDUA/ELLENDIÄ_01 ;
LEXICON V_ALENDUA/ELLENDIÄ_01 !!≈ * **@CODE@** ellendiä:ellendä alendua:alenda
!! Gradation No
: V-VV_01_Harm-Neutr_USUALLY-WEAK ;
:%^RmVow V-VV_01_Harm-Neutr_USUALLY-WEAK-VOWEL-LOSS ;
: V-VV_01_Harm-Neutr_USUALLY-STRONG	 ; ! this gives incorrect alendanuh
:%^RmVow V-VV_01_Harm-Neutr_USUALLY-STRONG-VOWEL-LOSS ;
: ACT-PRFPRC_nnUH ;!alendannuh/ellendännyh is correct
INF_A ;

LEXICON V_LIIKUTTUA !!≈ * **@CODE@** liikuttua:liikutta
!! Harmony: Back
:%{back%} V_LIIKUTTUA/MENETTIÄ_01 ;

LEXICON V_MENETTIÄ !!≈ * **@CODE@** menettiä:menettä
!! Harmony: Front
:%{front%} V_LIIKUTTUA/MENETTIÄ_01 ;
LEXICON V_LIIKUTTUA/MENETTIÄ_01 !!≈ * **@CODE@** liikuttua:liikutta, menettiä:menettä
!! Gradation YES
:%^WGStem V-VV_01_Harm-Neutr_USUALLY-WEAK ;
:%^WGStem%^RmVow V-VV_01_Harm-Neutr_USUALLY-WEAK-VOWEL-LOSS ;
:  V-VV_01_Harm-Neutr_USUALLY-STRONG ;!2024-11-04 this gives incorrect liikuttanuh
:%^RmVow  V-VV_01_Harm-Neutr_USUALLY-STRONG-VOWEL-LOSS ;!2024-11-04
:%^WGStem ACT-PRFPRC_nnUH ;!2025-09-05 liikutannuh is correct
INF_A ;

!CHECK THESE 2024-11-04
+Act: INDPRSSG3 ;
+Act: INDPRTSG3 ;
+Act: CONDPRS_S  ;

+Act:%^WGStem INDPRTPL3_Ettih ;
+Act:%^WGStem INDPRTCONNEG_nnuh ;
+Act:%^WGStem INDPRTCONNEGPL3_Ettu ;

+Act:%^WGStem CONDPRSPL3_Ettas ;
+Act:%^WGStem CONDPRT_nnus ;
+Act:%^WGStem CONDPRTPL3_Etannus ;

+Act: POT_N ;
+Act:%^WGStem POTPL3_Etanneh ;

+Act:%^WGStem IMPRT_kka ;
+Act:%^WGStem IMPRTPL3_Ettahes ;

:%^WGStem PSS-PRSPRC_Ettavu ;
:%^WGStem ACT-PRFPRC_nnuH ;
:%^WGStem PSS-PRFPRC_Ettu ;

 ACT-PRSPRC_OSTAI ;
 M-INF        ;
 GER_jen ;
 GER-TEMP_jes ;
!!


! V1o
!! -UO two‑syllable stem

LEXICON V_PUNUO !!≈ * **@CODE@** punuo:puno
!! Back vowel
:%{back%} V_PUNUO/XX_01 ;
